output/hyph-id.level7.pat.txt
uda2k
4udap
udawa5
3udek
u2d1h
u5di
2udos
3udosk
ud3r
udu5a
uduk1
udu2l
udu2r
udus4a
u1e
u3ed
u2ef
u3el
uelu3
uen1
u1f
ufe3
u2f1l
u2f3r
u1g
ugal1
uga4ri
uge2m
u3gi
u2gl
u2g4r
ugu4
ugu2r
u3ha.
uha5mi
u3har
uh1em
2uhi
uhi2d
uhid3a
1uhj
u1ho
uhu2d
u1i
u2ia
u5id
u2ie
u3i3f
u3i4k
3uik3u
u3il.
u5i2r1
ui3ri
u5ise
3ui2su
uita3r
u1j
uja3k
uja4n
uju2
ujud1
4ujut4
2uka
u3kac
u5kaj
u5kak
u3ka3m
u5kama
u2kan
u3kany
u3kas
u3kau
uka3ud
uk1aw
2uke
uke3t
u1kha
u3kin
1uki2r
u3kis
uk3l
uko3s
uk3ra
uk3re
uk3ro
2uk3s4
uku2e
uku3k
uku2l
uku2m
uk3und
u1l
ulah4
ulai3
u2laj
ula4k
ulak7a
ulak3u
ula2n
ulang3
u5lar
u3las
u5las.
u5la5si
u5lat
u3le4
ulek1
ulem3
ulen3
uler3
ul2i
u5lik
uli3ni
ulio3
ulis3a
uli4t
3ulitu
u2liz
ul3iza
u2l1ov
u3lu2
uluh1
ulul1
ul3umb
ulung3
uma4m
uma5mi
umang5u
uma3ni
uman5um
uma3r
uma5ra
uma4ri
uma3t4r
u3may
4umbah
umba7k
umbu4
umbuk3
umene3
umi3l
umi6n5at
u3mi4s
umpak3
3umpam
umpu5ni
umu2d
3umum
umu2r
umu2t
u4nab
una3g
unai3
un3alu
un1an
u2n1ay
unca4
uncu2
4undai
unda4k
unda5ri
undi4k
6undin
undu4
3unduh
unduk3
undut4
undu5ta
u3ne
une4k3
ung1
u3ngab
u3ngak
u3nga5l
u3ngas
u5ngau
unggak5
unggal5
unggu5k6
ung4i3
ungkah6a
ungke5l
ungkil5
u5ngo
u1ngu
u2ni.
un3iah
1unif
u3nis
5unjun.
uno3
2unom
unos4
5untaiu
unti2
untik3
3until
untu4
5untukk
u4nub
un3ubu
unu7h
u4num
un3umb
u3ny
unyam3
u1o
uo3dr
uos4
u1p
3upac
u3pad
3upah
upa3k
3upam3
u2p1an
up7an.
3upay
u3pe2
uper3a
upet1
2upi
u2pi.
u3pi2n
u3pir
up7l
up2le
up4li
u3plin
up5lis
u3po
u2p3r
up4ran
upre3
up4ro
up5ron
up5ru
up3s
upuk3a
u1q
u2ra
2u3ra.
u3raa
u3rab
u3rac
uraduk5
u3rae
u3raf
u3rag
u5rai
u3raj
u3rak
u3ral
u3ram
u4r1an
u5ranc
u5rang
u5rani
u5rant
u5rap
ura4pi
u5r2as
u5rat
urato4
ura5ur
2u3ray
urba5k
u5re
2urea3
uret4
u5ria
uri3b
u5rid
u3rin
uri3p
3urisu
u5rit
u5riu
urna5k
uro3b
uro4k
urok5r
uro3p
uro4p3l
uro5ps
uro3r
uro3s
uru2
2u3ru.
u3rua
uruk1
u2r1ul
ur3umb
u5rung.
u5ru4p1
u3rus1
3urusi
urut1
u2sa
3usai
2usal
us1an
3usang
3usap
usa4r
u5sat
1usea
use4l
2usen
use4r3
us2h
u3shal
u3sho
usik7an
usi2m3
u4s3int
usiona7
u5sir
u4sk
us3ko
u5skr
uso3
usok2
u4st
ustri5
usu2
usu5b
4usuk1
4usut
2usy
u4t7ah.
uta3ka
uta3ki
utame3
ut1an
u5tana
5utang.
5utangi
utara5
uta5ri
2ute
utebu3
u2t1em
4utero
5uteron
ut3h
u2ti.
u5tik.
utik5an
u5ti5l2
u2tim
utip1
ut5l
2uto
uto3s
ut3ra
ut5rad
utra5k
ut5re
ut7ri5
ut3rig
u4tro
ut5rofo
ut3ru
utua3
utual4
utuk7
utus5
u3u
uu1h2
uu1n
u1v
uvi5
u3w
uwa3n
uwi4r
2uwo
uwung5
u5y
uyu2
uyub1
u1z
uza3
5va
va1i
va3la
vano3
va3t
vati5k
v1b
v1d
ve3h
ve2i3
5vel
ve5lo
ven2a
3ver
ve2ra
ve3ran
ve5ri
vete5
veter4
v1g
vi4an
vi3f
vi1h
vi5o
vio3s
vi5ru
5visa
visin3
5vist
2vl
v1la
v1li
2v1n
vokal5a
vo5l2a
vo3p
2v1r
2v3s4
2v1t
vu3k
1wa
4waai
5waaira
wab3an
wa2bi
wada3s
wa3dy
wa2e
wag4
wa3gr
wahi5
wa2i
wa3idu
wai3t
waki2
wa3kr
wa4l3af
wale3n
wa3li5
walot3
wa2ma
wa2n
wa3ngi
wangki5
wangkis6
wa3ngu
wantek5
wantil5
wa3p
wapa1
wara5k
wara7n
warang6a
wari4s
warna5
was3aw
5wasi
wasi4t
wa3s2r
was5t
was3w
wata4k
wa4taw
wa3ti
wa1u
weduk3
3wen
wes1a
we2t
wet1a
wi1h
wi3k4
wila3h4
wimat5
1wi2n
win1i
wipe5
wiper4
wi3ra
wiri2
wi5ru
wit2
witi2
witis3
wo2i
wok2
wo5la
wo5n2a
wo3ni
wori4
2w1r
2w1t
3wu
wu3d
4wuf
wu3h2
wujud3
wu2ka
wu5l2
wulu3s4
wu3na
wung4a
wunggu5
wur1a
wu2ri
wu3s
wu4ta
wuyu3
2w1y
xi5l2
x1p
yada2
yadur5
ya3g4
yah3an
ya3hub
yahut3
ya3ira
yai5ri
ya3i3t2
yak3ay
yaki2
ya4ko
ya3li
yalib3
yalin4
yam2a
yama3h4
yama4k7
yambu7
yami2
yamik3
yampe4
ya2pa
ya3pad
yapa3t
ya2pi
yapu3k
yari5k
yas2
ya3sa
yas4t
yata3
yatro4
yatu3k
ya1uh
ya3u4k1
ya1ul
ya1up
yau2r
yawer3
y1b
2y3c
y1d
yeba4
yebab3
yebar5
yega2
ye3ka
yembul5
yemu3k
yenda4
yendat5
ye3ngi
ye3ngu
yente4
ye3ra
yerbe4
ye3r2e4
yerta3
yeru3k
yesa2
ye3t4a
yetop3
ye7t4ru
ye2u4
yeur1
y1f
2y1g
y1h
yi3f
yika2
yiku3
yi3l
yilet5
yilu3
yina2
yipa4
yira2
yiri2
yirik3
yisi2
yisi7k7
yisip3
2y1j
y1k
2y1l
y2o
yo3ha
yo2ka
yo2m
yong1
yongko5
yongkol6
yopa2
yopi2
yo4sp
yo2t1
y1r
2y1s
y1t
yta5
yua3s
yu3hu
yu3ka
yuku2
yu3l
yula5k
yu2m4a
yu2mi
yung4a
yun4k
yusu3k4
yut1
yu2ti
yut4r
yu5tra.
1yuz
2y1w
2y1y
za4a
za1h
za2i
za3im
zali2
zalim3
zam2a
za3ti
2z1b
2z1d
1ze
ze3i
ze3k
2z1h
zi3b
zim3an
zio4
zi3p
2z1k
z1l
zlo3
2z1m
2z1n
zoe3
zo3ha
zo3i
zono3
zo3o
zos3f
zo5sp
2z1t
zu1h
zu3k
zu3n
zu3r
2z1y
2z1z
ê1d
ê1n
ê3r
êra1
